Utah statutes.
58-80a-301.   Certification.

(1)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a certificate as a certified medical language interpreter.

(2)  A certificate described in Subsection (1) shall specify the language that the person is certified for.

(3)  This chapter prohibits a person from representing or holding oneself out as a certified medical language interpreter if the person does not have a certificate described in Subsection (1).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 127, 2010 General Session

